Illinois, session 104th, SB3051.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-30 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-30)7    Sec. 22-30. Administration and carry of 8Self-administration and self-carry of asthma medication and 9epinephrine injectors; administration of undesignated 10epinephrine injectors; administration of an opioid antagonist; 11administration of undesignated asthma medication; supply of 12undesignated oxygen tanks; asthma episode emergency response 13protocol.14    (a) For the purpose of this Section only, the following 15terms shall have the meanings set forth below:16    "Asthma action plan" means a written plan developed with a 17pupil's medical provider to help control the pupil's asthma. 18The goal of an asthma action plan is to reduce or prevent 19flare-ups and emergency department visits through day-to-day 20management and to serve as a student-specific document to be 21referenced in the event of an asthma episode.22    "Asthma episode emergency response protocol" means a 23procedure to provide assistance to a pupil experiencing   SB3051 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1symptoms of wheezing, coughing, shortness of breath, chest 2tightness, or breathing difficulty.3    "Epinephrine injector" includes an auto-injector approved 4by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the 5administration of epinephrine and a pre-filled syringe 6approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and 7used for the administration of epinephrine that contains a 8pre-measured dose of epinephrine that is equivalent to the 9dosages used in an auto-injector. 10    "Asthma medication" means quick-relief asthma medication, 11including albuterol or other short-acting bronchodilators, 12that is approved by the United States Food and Drug 13Administration for the treatment of respiratory distress. 14"Asthma medication" includes medication delivered through a 15device, including a metered dose inhaler with a reusable or 16disposable spacer or a nebulizer with a mouthpiece or mask.17    "Opioid antagonist" means a drug that binds to opioid 18receptors and blocks or inhibits the effect of opioids acting 19on those receptors, including, but not limited to, naloxone 20hydrochloride or any other similarly acting drug approved by 21the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. 22    "Respiratory distress" means the perceived or actual 23presence of wheezing, coughing, shortness of breath, chest 24tightness, breathing difficulty, or any other symptoms 25consistent with asthma. Respiratory distress may be 26categorized as "mild-to-moderate" or "severe".   SB3051 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1    "School nurse" means a registered nurse working in a 2school with or without licensure endorsed in school nursing. 3    "Self-administration" means a pupil's discretionary use of 4his or her prescribed asthma medication or epinephrine 5injector.6    "Self-carry" means a pupil's ability to carry his or her 7prescribed asthma medication or epinephrine injector.8    "Standing protocol" may be issued by (i) a physician 9licensed to practice medicine in all its branches, (ii) a 10licensed physician assistant with prescriptive authority, or 11(iii) a licensed advanced practice registered nurse with 12prescriptive authority. 13    "Trained personnel" means any school employee or volunteer 14personnel authorized in Sections 10-22.34, 10-22.34a, and 1510-22.34b of this Code who has completed training under 16subsection (g) of this Section to recognize and respond to 17anaphylaxis, an opioid overdose, or respiratory distress, or a 18severe hypoglycemia emergency.19    "Undesignated asthma medication" means asthma medication 20prescribed in the name of a school district, public school, 21charter school, or nonpublic school.22    "Undesignated epinephrine injector" means an epinephrine 23injector prescribed in the name of a school district, public 24school, charter school, or nonpublic school. 25    "Undesignated glucagon" means a glucagon rescue therapy 26approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and   SB3051 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1prescribed in the name of a school district, public school, 2charter school, or nonpublic school for the treatment of 3severe hypoglycemia in a dosage form that can be rapidly 4administered to a person in an emergency, including prefilled 5or nasally administered glucagon. 6    (b) A school, whether public, charter, or nonpublic, must 7permit the self-administration and self-carry of asthma 8medication by a pupil with asthma or the self-administration 9and self-carry of an epinephrine injector by a pupil, provided 10that:11        (1) the parents or guardians of the pupil provide to 12    the school (i) written authorization from the parents or 13    guardians for (A) the self-administration and self-carry 14    of asthma medication or (B) the self-carry of asthma 15    medication or (ii) for (A) the self-administration and 16    self-carry of an epinephrine injector or (B) the 17    self-carry of an epinephrine injector, written 18    authorization from the pupil's physician, physician 19    assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse; and20        (2) the parents or guardians of the pupil provide to 21    the school (i) the prescription label, which must contain 22    the name of the asthma medication, the prescribed dosage, 23    and the time at which or circumstances under which the 24    asthma medication is to be administered, or (ii) for the 25    self-administration or self-carry of an epinephrine 26    injector, a written statement from the pupil's physician,   SB3051 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1    physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse 2    containing the following information:3            (A) the name and purpose of the epinephrine 4        injector;5            (B) the prescribed dosage; and6            (C) the time or times at which or the special 7        circumstances under which the epinephrine injector is 8        to be administered.9The information provided shall be kept on file in the office of 10the school nurse or, in the absence of a school nurse, the 11school's administrator.12    (b-5) A school district, public school, charter school, or 13nonpublic school may authorize the provision of a 14student-specific or undesignated epinephrine injector to a 15student or any personnel authorized under a student's 16Individual Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action 17plan, or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 18Rehabilitation Act of 1973 to administer an epinephrine 19injector to the student, that meets the student's prescription 20on file.21    (b-10) The school district, public school, charter school, 22or nonpublic school may authorize a school nurse or trained 23personnel to do the following: (i) provide an undesignated 24epinephrine injector to a student for self-administration only 25or any personnel authorized under a student's Individual 26Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action plan, plan   SB3051 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 21973, or individualized education program plan to administer 3to the student that meets the student's prescription on file; 4(ii) administer an undesignated epinephrine injector that 5meets the prescription on file to any student who has an 6Individual Health Care Action Plan, allergy emergency action 7plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 8Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized education 9program plan that authorizes the use of an epinephrine 10injector; (iii) administer an undesignated epinephrine 11injector to any person that the school nurse or trained 12personnel in good faith believes is having an anaphylactic 13reaction; (iv) administer an opioid antagonist to any person 14that the school nurse or trained personnel in good faith 15believes is having an opioid overdose; (v) provide 16undesignated asthma medication to a student for 17self-administration only or to any personnel authorized under 18a student's Individual Health Care Action Plan or asthma 19action plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal 20Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized education 21program plan to administer to the student that meets the 22student's prescription on file; (vi) administer undesignated 23asthma medication that meets the prescription on file to any 24student who has an Individual Health Care Action Plan or 25asthma action plan, plan pursuant to Section 504 of the 26federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, or individualized   SB3051 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1education program plan that authorizes the use of asthma 2medication; and (vii) administer undesignated asthma 3medication to any person that the school nurse or trained 4personnel believes in good faith is having respiratory 5distress; (viii) provide undesignated glucagon to any 6personnel authorized under a student's Individual Health Care 7Action Plan, in accordance with the student's prescriber's 8order or Section 504 plan, individualized education program, 9or other written accommodations plan, to administer glucagon 10to the student; and (ix) administer undesignated glucagon to a 11student in accordance with the student's prescriber's order, 12Individual Health Care Action Plan, or Section 504 plan, 13individualized education program, or other written 14accommodations plan that authorizes the use of glucagon. 15    (c) The school district, public school, charter school, or 16nonpublic school must inform the parents or guardians of the 17pupil, in writing, that the school district, public school, 18charter school, or nonpublic school and its employees and 19agents, including a physician, physician assistant, or 20advanced practice registered nurse providing standing protocol 21and a prescription for school epinephrine injectors, an opioid 22antagonist, or undesignated asthma medication, or undesignated 23glucagon are to incur no liability or professional discipline, 24except for willful and wanton conduct, as a result of any 25injury arising from the administration of asthma medication, 26an epinephrine injector, or an opioid antagonist, or glucagon,   SB3051 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1regardless of whether authorization was given by the pupil's 2parents or guardians or by the pupil's physician, physician 3assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse. The parents 4or guardians of the pupil must sign a statement acknowledging 5that the school district, public school, charter school, or 6nonpublic school and its employees and agents are to incur no 7liability, except for willful and wanton conduct, as a result 8of any injury arising from the administration of asthma 9medication, an epinephrine injector, or an opioid antagonist, 10or glucagon, regardless of whether authorization was given by 11the pupil's parents or guardians or by the pupil's physician, 12physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, 13and that the parents or guardians must indemnify and hold 14harmless the school district, public school, charter school, 15or nonpublic school and its employees and agents against any 16claims, except a claim based on willful and wanton conduct, 17arising out of the administration of asthma medication, an 18epinephrine injector, or an opioid antagonist, or glucagon, 19regardless of whether authorization was given by the pupil's 20parents or guardians or by the pupil's physician, physician 21assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse.22    (c-5) When a school nurse or trained personnel administers 23an undesignated epinephrine injector to a person whom the 24school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes is 25having an anaphylactic reaction, administers an opioid 26antagonist to a person whom the school nurse or trained   SB3051 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1personnel in good faith believes is having an opioid overdose, 2or administers undesignated asthma medication to a person whom 3the school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes 4is having respiratory distress, notwithstanding the lack of 5notice to the parents or guardians of the pupil or the absence 6of the parents or guardians signed statement acknowledging no 7liability, except for willful and wanton conduct, the school 8district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 9and its employees and agents, and a physician, a physician 10assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse providing 11standing protocol and a prescription for undesignated 12epinephrine injectors, an opioid antagonist, or undesignated 13asthma medication, or undesignated glucagon are to incur no 14liability or professional discipline, except for willful and 15wanton conduct, as a result of any injury arising from the use 16of an undesignated epinephrine injector, the use of an opioid 17antagonist, or the use of undesignated asthma medication, or 18the use of undesignated glucagon, regardless of whether 19authorization was given by the pupil's parents or guardians or 20by the pupil's physician, physician assistant, or advanced 21practice registered nurse.22    (d) The permission for self-administration and self-carry 23of asthma medication or the self-administration and self-carry 24of an epinephrine injector is effective for the school year 25for which it is granted and shall be renewed each subsequent 26school year upon fulfillment of the requirements of this   SB3051 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1Section.2    (e) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 3fulfilled, a pupil with asthma may self-administer and 4self-carry his or her asthma medication or a pupil may 5self-administer and self-carry an epinephrine injector (i) 6while in school, (ii) while at a school-sponsored activity, 7(iii) while under the supervision of school personnel, or (iv) 8before or after normal school activities, such as while in 9before-school or after-school care on school-operated property 10or while being transported on a school bus.11    (e-5) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 12fulfilled, a school nurse or trained personnel may administer 13an undesignated epinephrine injector to any person whom the 14school nurse or trained personnel in good faith believes to be 15having an anaphylactic reaction (i) while in school, (ii) 16while at a school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the 17supervision of school personnel, or (iv) before or after 18normal school activities, such as while in before-school or 19after-school care on school-operated property or while being 20transported on a school bus. A school nurse or trained 21personnel may carry undesignated epinephrine injectors on his 22or her person while in school or at a school-sponsored 23activity. 24    (e-10) Provided that the requirements of this Section are 25fulfilled, a school nurse or trained personnel may administer 26an opioid antagonist to any person whom the school nurse or   SB3051 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1trained personnel in good faith believes to be having an 2opioid overdose (i) while in school, (ii) while at a 3school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the supervision 4of school personnel, or (iv) before or after normal school 5activities, such as while in before-school or after-school 6care on school-operated property. A school nurse or trained 7personnel may carry an opioid antagonist on his or her person 8while in school or at a school-sponsored activity. 9    (e-15) If the requirements of this Section are met, a 10school nurse or trained personnel may administer undesignated 11asthma medication to any person whom the school nurse or 12trained personnel in good faith believes to be experiencing 13respiratory distress (i) while in school, (ii) while at a 14school-sponsored activity, (iii) while under the supervision 15of school personnel, or (iv) before or after normal school 16activities, including before-school or after-school care on 17school-operated property. A school nurse or trained personnel 18may carry undesignated asthma medication on his or her person 19while in school or at a school-sponsored activity. 20    (e-20) A school nurse or trained personnel may carry 21undesignated glucagon on his or her person while in school or 22at a school-sponsored activity. 23    (f) The school district, public school, charter school, or 24nonpublic school may maintain a supply of undesignated 25epinephrine injectors in any secure location that is 26accessible before, during, and after school where an allergic   SB3051 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1person is most at risk, including, but not limited to, 2classrooms and lunchrooms. A physician, a physician assistant 3who has prescriptive authority in accordance with Section 7.5 4of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an 5advanced practice registered nurse who has prescriptive 6authority in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 7Practice Act may prescribe undesignated epinephrine injectors 8in the name of the school district, public school, charter 9school, or nonpublic school to be maintained for use when 10necessary. Any supply of epinephrine injectors shall be 11maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.12    The school district, public school, charter school, or 13nonpublic school shall maintain a supply of an opioid 14antagonist in any secure location where an individual may have 15an opioid overdose, unless there is a shortage of opioid 16antagonists, in which case the school district, public school, 17charter school, or nonpublic school shall make a reasonable 18effort to maintain a supply of an opioid antagonist. Unless 19the school district, public school, charter school, or 20nonpublic school is able to obtain opioid antagonists without 21a prescription, a health care professional who has been 22delegated prescriptive authority for opioid antagonists in 23accordance with Section 5-23 of the Substance Use Disorder Act 24shall prescribe opioid antagonists in the name of the school 25district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school, 26to be maintained for use when necessary. Any supply of opioid   SB3051 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1antagonists shall be maintained in accordance with the 2manufacturer's instructions. 3    The school district, public school, charter school, or 4nonpublic school may maintain a supply of asthma medication in 5any secure location that is accessible before, during, or 6after school where a person is most at risk, including, but not 7limited to, a classroom or the nurse's office. A physician, a 8physician assistant who has prescriptive authority under 9Section 7.5 of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, 10or an advanced practice registered nurse who has prescriptive 11authority under Section 65-40 of the Nurse Practice Act may 12prescribe undesignated asthma medication in the name of the 13school district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic 14school to be maintained for use when necessary. Any supply of 15undesignated asthma medication must be maintained in 16accordance with the manufacturer's instructions. 17    The school district, public school, charter school, or 18nonpublic school may maintain a supply of undesignated 19glucagon in any secure location that is accessible before, 20during, or after school where a person is most at risk, 21including, but not limited to, a classroom or the nurse's 22office. A physician, a physician assistant who has 23prescriptive authority under Section 7.5 of the Physician 24Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an advanced practice 25registered nurse who has prescriptive authority under Section 2665-40 of the Nurse Practice Act may prescribe undesignated   SB3051 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1glucagon in the name of the school district, public school, 2charter school, or nonpublic school to be maintained for use 3when necessary. Any supply of undesignated glucagon must be 4maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions. 5    A school district that provides special educational 6facilities for children with disabilities under Section 714-4.01 of this Code may maintain a supply of undesignated 8oxygen tanks in any secure location that is accessible before, 9during, and after school where a person with developmental 10disabilities is most at risk, including, but not limited to, 11classrooms and lunchrooms. A physician, a physician assistant 12who has prescriptive authority in accordance with Section 7.5 13of the Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, or an 14advanced practice registered nurse who has prescriptive 15authority in accordance with Section 65-40 of the Nurse 16Practice Act may prescribe undesignated oxygen tanks in the 17name of the school district that provides special educational 18facilities for children with disabilities under Section 1914-4.01 of this Code to be maintained for use when necessary. 20Any supply of oxygen tanks shall be maintained in accordance 21with the manufacturer's instructions and with the local fire 22department's rules. 23    (f-3) Whichever entity initiates the process of obtaining 24undesignated epinephrine injectors and providing training to 25personnel for carrying and administering undesignated 26epinephrine injectors shall pay for the costs of the   SB3051 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1undesignated epinephrine injectors.2    (f-5) Upon any administration of an epinephrine injector, 3a school district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic 4school must immediately activate the EMS system and notify the 5student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, if known.6    Upon any administration of an opioid antagonist, a school 7district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 8must immediately activate the EMS system and notify the 9student's parent, guardian, or emergency contact, if known. 10    (f-10) Within 24 hours of the administration of an 11undesignated epinephrine injector, a school district, public 12school, charter school, or nonpublic school must notify the 13physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice 14registered nurse who provided the standing protocol and a 15prescription for the undesignated epinephrine injector of its 16use. 17    Within 24 hours after the administration of an opioid 18antagonist, a school district, public school, charter school, 19or nonpublic school must notify the health care professional 20who provided the prescription for the opioid antagonist of its 21use. 22    Within 24 hours after the administration of undesignated 23asthma medication, a school district, public school, charter 24school, or nonpublic school must notify the student's parent 25or guardian or emergency contact, if known, and the physician, 26physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who   SB3051 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1provided the standing protocol and a prescription for the 2undesignated asthma medication of its use. The district or 3school must follow up with the school nurse, if available, and 4may, with the consent of the child's parent or guardian, 5notify the child's health care provider of record, as 6determined under this Section, of its use. 7    Within 24 hours after the administration of undesignated 8glucagon, a school district, public school, charter school, or 9nonpublic school must notify the student's parent or guardian 10or emergency contact, if known, and the physician, physician 11assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who provided 12the standing protocol and a prescription for the undesignated 13glucagon of its use. 14    (g) Prior to the administration of an undesignated 15epinephrine injector, trained personnel must submit to the 16school's administration proof of completion of a training 17curriculum to recognize and respond to anaphylaxis that meets 18the requirements of subsection (h) of this Section. Training 19must be completed annually. The school district, public 20school, charter school, or nonpublic school must maintain 21records related to the training curriculum and trained 22personnel.23    Prior to the administration of an opioid antagonist, 24trained personnel must submit to the school's administration 25proof of completion of a training curriculum to recognize and 26respond to an opioid overdose, which curriculum must meet the   SB3051 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1requirements of subsection (h-5) of this Section. The school 2district, public school, charter school, or nonpublic school 3must maintain records relating to the training curriculum and 4the trained personnel. 5    Prior to the administration of undesignated asthma 6medication, trained personnel must submit to the school's 7administration proof of completion of a training curriculum to 8recognize and respond to respiratory distress, which must meet 9the requirements of subsection (h-10) of this Section. 10Training must be completed annually, and the school district, 11public school, charter school, or nonpublic school must 12maintain records relating to the training curriculum and the 13trained personnel. 14    Prior to the administration of undesignated glucagon, 15trained personnel must submit to the school's administration 16proof of completion of a training curriculum to recognize and 17respond to severe hypoglycemia emergencies, which must meet 18the requirements of subsection (h-15) of this Section. 19Training must be completed annually, and the school district, 20public school, charter school, or nonpublic school must 21maintain records relating to the training curriculum and the 22trained personnel. 23    (h) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to 24anaphylaxis, including the administration of an undesignated 25epinephrine injector, may be conducted online or in person.26    Training shall include, but is not limited to:  SB3051 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1        (1) how to recognize signs and symptoms of an allergic 2    reaction, including anaphylaxis;3        (2) how to administer an epinephrine injector; and4        (3) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 5    required to recognize anaphylaxis and administer an 6    epinephrine injector.7    Training may also include, but is not limited to:8        (A) a review of high-risk areas within a school and 9    its related facilities;10        (B) steps to take to prevent exposure to allergens;11        (C) emergency follow-up procedures, including the 12    importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is not available, 13    other local emergency medical services;14        (D) how to respond to a student with a known allergy, 15    as well as a student with a previously unknown allergy;16        (E) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 17    pursuant to this Section; and18        (F) any policy developed by the State Board of 19    Education under Section 2-3.190.20    In consultation with statewide professional organizations 21representing physicians licensed to practice medicine in all 22of its branches, registered nurses, and school nurses, the 23State Board of Education shall make available resource 24materials consistent with criteria in this subsection (h) for 25educating trained personnel to recognize and respond to 26anaphylaxis. The State Board may take into consideration the   SB3051 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1curriculum on this subject developed by other states, as well 2as any other curricular materials suggested by medical experts 3and other groups that work on life-threatening allergy issues. 4The State Board is not required to create new resource 5materials. The State Board shall make these resource materials 6available on its Internet website.7    (h-5) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to an 8opioid overdose, including the administration of an opioid 9antagonist, may be conducted online or in person. The training 10must comply with any training requirements under Section 5-23 11of the Substance Use Disorder Act and the corresponding rules. 12It must include, but is not limited to:13        (1) how to recognize symptoms of an opioid overdose;14        (2) information on drug overdose prevention and 15    recognition;16        (3) how to perform rescue breathing and resuscitation;17        (4) how to respond to an emergency involving an opioid 18    overdose;19        (5) opioid antagonist dosage and administration;20        (6) the importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is 21    not available, other local emergency medical services;22        (7) care for the overdose victim after administration 23    of the overdose antagonist;24        (8) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 25    required to recognize an opioid overdose and administer a 26    dose of an opioid antagonist; and  SB3051 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1        (9) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 2    pursuant to this Section. 3    (h-10) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to 4respiratory distress, including the administration of 5undesignated asthma medication, may be conducted online or in 6person. The training must include, but is not limited to:7        (1) how to recognize symptoms of respiratory distress 8    and how to distinguish respiratory distress from 9    anaphylaxis;10        (2) how to respond to an emergency involving 11    respiratory distress;12        (3) asthma medication dosage and administration;13        (4) the importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is 14    not available, other local emergency medical services;15        (5) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 16    required to recognize respiratory distress and administer 17    asthma medication; and18        (6) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 19    under this Section. 20    (h-15) A training curriculum to recognize and respond to 21severe hypoglycemia emergencies, including the administration 22of undesignated glucagon, may be conducted online or in 23person. The training must include, but is not limited to:24        (1) how to recognize the symptoms of severe 25    hypoglycemia emergencies;26        (2) how to respond to an emergency involving severe   SB3051 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1    hypoglycemia;2        (3) glucagon dosage and administration;3        (4) the importance of calling 9-1-1 or, if 9-1-1 is 4    not available, other local emergency medical services;5        (5) a test demonstrating competency of the knowledge 6    required to recognize severe hypoglycemia emergencies and 7    administer glucagon; and8        (6) other criteria as determined in rules adopted 9    under this Section. 10    (i) Within 3 days after the administration of an 11undesignated epinephrine injector by a school nurse, trained 12personnel, or a student at a school or school-sponsored 13activity, the school must report to the State Board of 14Education in a form and manner prescribed by the State Board 15the following information:16        (1) age and type of person receiving epinephrine 17    (student, staff, visitor);18        (2) any previously known diagnosis of a severe 19    allergy;20        (3) trigger that precipitated allergic episode;21        (4) location where symptoms developed;22        (5) number of doses administered;23        (6) type of person administering epinephrine (school 24    nurse, trained personnel, student); and25        (7) any other information required by the State Board.26    If a school district, public school, charter school, or   SB3051 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1nonpublic school maintains or has an independent contractor 2providing transportation to students who maintains a supply of 3undesignated epinephrine injectors, then the school district, 4public school, charter school, or nonpublic school must report 5that information to the State Board of Education upon adoption 6or change of the policy of the school district, public school, 7charter school, nonpublic school, or independent contractor, 8in a manner as prescribed by the State Board. The report must 9include the number of undesignated epinephrine injectors in 10supply.11    (i-5) Within 3 days after the administration of an opioid 12antagonist by a school nurse or trained personnel, the school 13must report to the State Board of Education, in a form and 14manner prescribed by the State Board, the following 15information:16        (1) the age and type of person receiving the opioid 17    antagonist (student, staff, or visitor);18        (2) the location where symptoms developed;19        (3) the type of person administering the opioid 20    antagonist (school nurse or trained personnel); and21        (4) any other information required by the State Board. 22    (i-10) Within 3 days after the administration of 23undesignated asthma medication by a school nurse, trained 24personnel, or a student at a school or school-sponsored 25activity, the school must report to the State Board of 26Education, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the State   SB3051 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1Board of Education, the following information:2        (1) the age and type of person receiving the asthma 3    medication (student, staff, or visitor);4        (2) any previously known diagnosis of asthma for the 5    person;6        (3) the trigger that precipitated respiratory 7    distress, if identifiable;8        (4) the location of where the symptoms developed;9        (5) the number of doses administered;10        (6) the type of person administering the asthma 11    medication (school nurse, trained personnel, or student);12        (7) the outcome of the asthma medication 13    administration; and14        (8) any other information required by the State Board. 15    (i-15) Within 3 days after the administration of 16undesignated glucagon by a school nurse or trained personnel, 17the school must report to the State Board of Education, on a 18form and in a manner prescribed by the State Board of 19Education, the following information:20        (1) the age of the student receiving the undesignated 21    glucagon;22        (2) any previously known diagnosis of severe 23    hypoglycemia for the person;24        (3) the trigger that precipitated the severe 25    hypoglycemia emergency, if identifiable;26        (4) the location of where the symptoms developed;  SB3051 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1        (5) the number of doses administered;2        (6) the type of person administering the undesignated 3    glucagon (school nurse or trained personnel);4        (7) the outcome of the glucagon administration; and5        (8) any other information required by the State Board. 6    (j) By October 1, 2015 and every year thereafter, the 7State Board of Education shall submit a report to the General 8Assembly identifying the frequency and circumstances of 9undesignated epinephrine and undesignated asthma medication 10administration during the preceding academic year. Beginning 11with the 2017 report, the report shall also contain 12information on which school districts, public schools, charter 13schools, and nonpublic schools maintain or have independent 14contractors providing transportation to students who maintain 15a supply of undesignated epinephrine injectors. This report 16shall be published on the State Board's Internet website on 17the date the report is delivered to the General Assembly.18    (j-5) Annually, each school district, public school, 19charter school, or nonpublic school shall request an asthma 20action plan from the parents or guardians of a pupil with 21asthma. If provided, the asthma action plan must be kept on 22file in the office of the school nurse or, in the absence of a 23school nurse, the school administrator. Copies of the asthma 24action plan may be distributed to appropriate school staff who 25interact with the pupil on a regular basis, and, if 26applicable, may be attached to the pupil's federal Section 504   SB3051 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1plan or individualized education program plan.2    (j-10) To assist schools with emergency response 3procedures for asthma, the State Board of Education, in 4consultation with statewide professional organizations with 5expertise in asthma management and a statewide organization 6representing school administrators, shall develop a model 7asthma episode emergency response protocol before September 1, 82016. Each school district, charter school, and nonpublic 9school shall adopt an asthma episode emergency response 10protocol before January 1, 2017 that includes all of the 11components of the State Board's model protocol.12    (j-15) (Blank).13    (j-20) On or before October 1, 2016 and every year 14thereafter, the State Board of Education shall submit a report 15to the General Assembly and the Department of Public Health 16identifying the frequency and circumstances of opioid 17antagonist administration during the preceding academic year. 18This report shall be published on the State Board's Internet 19website on the date the report is delivered to the General 20Assembly. 21    (j-25) On or before October 1, 2027 and every year 22thereafter, the State Board of Education shall submit a report 23to the General Assembly and the Department of Public Health 24identifying the frequency and circumstances of undesignated 25glucagon administration during the preceding school year. This 26report shall be published on the State Board's Internet   SB3051 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 16562 LNS 29960 b1website on the date the report is delivered to the General 2Assembly. 3    (k) The State Board of Education may adopt rules necessary 4to implement this Section. 5    (l) Nothing in this Section shall limit the amount of 6epinephrine injectors that any type of school or student may 7carry or maintain a supply of.8(Source: P.A. 102-413, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-196, eff. 1-1-24; 103-348, eff. 101-1-24; 103-542, eff. 7-1-24 (see Section 905 of P.A. 103-563 11for effective date of P.A. 103-542); 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)